Maryland, session 2025, SB0242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
SUBTITLE 9. MARYLAND DIGITAL SERVICE.
3.5–901.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “SERVICE” MEANS THE MARYLAND DIGITAL SERVICE.
3.5–902.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0242*

SENATE BILL 242
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND DIGITAL SERVICE WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE SERVICE IS A CENTRALIZED UNIT WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT THAT
COLLABORATES WITH UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT TO SUPPORT IMPROVED
SERVICE DELIVERY TO MARYLAND RESIDENTS AND AGENCY STAFF THROUGH
USER–CENTERED DESIGN, SOFTWARE DEVELOPMENT, AND PRODUCT MANAGEMENT
BEST PRACTICES.
3.5–903.
THE SERVICE IS RESPONSIBLE FOR:
(1) ASSISTING UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT TO PRIORITIZE THE
DEVELOPMENT AND PROCUREMENT OF USER–FRIENDLY, ACCESSIBLE, AND
MULTILINGUAL DIGITAL PLATFORMS TO ENSURE THAT ALL MARYLAND RESIDENTS,
INCLUDING INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES, CAN EASILY ACCESS AND USE
GOVERNMENT SERVICES AND INFORMATION;
(2) WORKING COLLABORATIVELY WITH UNITS OF STATE
GOVERNMENT TO:
(I) CONSOLIDATE AND STREAMLINE MARYLAND’S WEBSITES
AND DIGITAL APPLICATIONS TO REDUCE REDUNDANCY, COMPLEXITY, AND
MAINTENANCE COSTS; AND
(II) PRIORITIZE PROJECTS THAT ARE FINANCIALLY EFFICIENT
AND DRIVE POSITIVE OUTCOMES FOR MARYLAND RESIDENTS; AND
(3) OVERSEEING THE IMPLEMENTATION OF USER–CENTERED DESIGN
PRINCIPLES, ACCESSIBILITY STANDARDS, AND BEST PRACTICES IN DIGITAL
SERVICE DELIVERY ACROSS UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT.
3.5–904.
THE SECRETARY SHALL APPOINT A CHIEF DIGITAL EXPERIENCE OFFICER TO
LEAD THE SERVICE.
3.5–905.
UNITS OF STATE GOVERNMENT SHALL COLLABORATE WITH THE SERVICE TO
ENSURE THE ALIGNMENT AND FUNDING OF DIGITAL INITIATIVES WITH THE
OVERALL GOALS AND PRIORITIES OF THE STATE CONSISTENT WITH THE STATEWIDE
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MASTER PLAN.

SENATE BILL 242 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.